Utah, session 2026, SB187.
Section 1. Section 57-22-8 is enacted to read:57-22-8. Renter credit reporting.(1)As used in this section:(a)"City of the first class" means a municipality designated as a city of the first class under Section 10-2-301.(b)"Housing authority" means a housing authority:(i)created:(A)in accordance with Section 53A-8-402; and(B)by a city of the first class; and(ii)that enters into a rental agreement with a renter for a rental unit that is owned by the housing authority.(c)"Nationwide consumer reporting agency" means the same as the term "consumer reporting agency that compiles and maintains files on consumers on a nationwide basis" is defined in 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681a(p).(d)"Offer of rent reporting" means a written statement that states:(i)that the housing authority reporting the renter's rent payments is optional;(ii)the nationwide consumer reporting agency to which the housing authority will report the renter's rent payments;(iii)if the housing authority will charge the renter a fee in accordance with Subsection (3), the dollar amount of the fee;(iv)that a renter may enroll and unenroll in rent reporting at any time during the duration of the rental agreement;(v)instructions on how the renter may enroll and unenroll in rent reporting; and(vi)if the renter opts out of rent reporting or fails to pay the fee described in Subsection (3), that the renter may not reenroll in rent reporting for six months after the day on which the renter opts out or fails to pay the fee.(e)"Rent reporting" means a service that a housing authority offers in which a renter may enroll where the housing authority reports each rent payment that a renter makes to a nationwide consumer reporting agency, regardless of whether that rent payment complies with the terms of the rental agreement.(2)On or after July 1, 2026:(a)at the time a housing authority enters into a rental agreement with a renter, the housing authority shall provide the renter an offer of rent reporting; and(b)at least once annually, a housing authority shall provide a renter an offer of rent reporting.(3)A housing authority may charge a fee for reporting a renter's rent payment that may not exceed the housing authority's actual cost of reporting a renter's rent payment.(4)If a renter fails to pay the fee described in Subsection (3), a housing authority:(a)may stop reporting the renter's rent payments; and(b)may not:(i)impose a fee for failing to pay the fee described in Subsection (3);(ii)treat the renter's failure to pay the fee described in Subsection (3) as a violation of the rental agreement; or(iii)treat the renter's failure to pay the fee described in Subsection (3) as grounds for evicting the renter.(5)If a housing authority stops reporting the renter's rent payments in accordance with Subsection (4)(a), the renter may not reenroll in rent reporting for at least six months after the day on which the renter fails to pay the fee described in Subsection (3).(6)(a)A renter may:(i)subject to Subsections (5) and (6)(b)(i), enroll and reenroll in rent reporting at any time during the duration of the rental agreement; and(ii)unenroll in rent reporting at any time during the duration of the rental agreement by submitting a written statement to the housing authority that states the renter opts out of rent reporting.(b)If a renter opts out of rent reporting in accordance with this Subsection (6):(i)the renter may not reenroll in rent reporting for six months after the day on which the renter opts out; and(ii)the housing authority may not report a rent payment the renter makes after the renter unenrolls from rent reporting unless the renter reenrolls in rent reporting.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 63I-2-257 is amended to read:63I-2-257. Repeal dates: Title 57.Reserved.Section 57-22-8, Renter credit reporting, is repealed December 31, 2027.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.